Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 38. Alcohol and Substance Abuse Accountability.

Effective dates. —

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.